Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.200

Street railways at expense of property benefited.

Any city or town in this state owning and operating a municipal street railway over one hundred miles of track shall have power to provide for purchasing, or otherwise acquiring, or constructing and equipping surface, subway and elevated street railways and extensions thereof, and to levy and collect special assessments on property specially benefited thereby, for paying the cost and expense of the same or any portion thereof, as hereinafter provided.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.43.200. Prior: 1923 c 176 s 1; RRS s 9425-1.]